Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1827.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-117, to read: START_STATUTE41-117. Office of advanced air mobility; powers and duties; annual report; definition A. The Office of advanced air mobility is established in the office of the governor. B. The office of advanced air mobility may: 1. Act as a LIAISON between this state, the federal AVIATION administration and aviation organizations, including federal and state agencies and industries that support advanced air mobility. 2. Identify and pursue, as appropriate, OPPORTUNITIES to increase advanced air mobility in this state. 3. Support arizona-based companies that seek to expand advanced air mobility in this state. 4. Advance this state's economic interests related to advanced air mobility. 5. Develop and implement a REOCCURRING strategic plan to enhance this state's COMPETITIVENESS in advanced air mobility. 6. Identify and support emerging technology, including commercialization support services to accelerate technology development. 7. Collaborate with the Arizona board of regents and universities and research INSTITUTIONS that seek to increase funding for advanced air MOBILITY research and development. 8. Collaborate to enhance workforce development that prepares innovators and Entrepreneurs to support industries related to advanced air mobility. 9. Coordinate with the Governor and the LEGISLATURE on the office's ACTIVITIES, achievements and RECOMMENDATIONS. C. subject to the availability of monies, The office shall issue requests for proposals for the purposes of ESTABLISHING contracts relating to advanced air mobility. D. On or before December 31, 2027 and each year thereafter, the office shall submit a report regarding the activities of the office and RECOMMENDATIONS to the Governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. E. For the purposes of this section, "Advanced air mobility" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-8601. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; office of advanced air mobility; exemption A. The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the advanced air mobility fund established by section 28-8604, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the office of advanced air mobility established by section 41-117, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, to provide grants to entities for the advancement of advanced air mobility in this state. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.